Illinois, session 104th, HB785.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Embalming Fluid Act is amended by changing 5Section 0.01 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 35/0.01)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 280)7    Sec. 0.01. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Embalming Fluid Act.9(Source: P.A. 86-1324.)